data/lexd/00-patterns.lexd
PATTERNS
StemsN_P25_x[gMsc] InflN_P25_x[gMsc]
StemsN_P25_x[gFem] InflN_P25_x[gFem]
StemsN_P25_x[gNeut] InflN_P25_x[gNeut]
StemsN_P25comp_x[gMsc] InflN_P25comp_x[gMsc]
StemsN_P25comp_x[gFem] InflN_P25comp_x[gFem]
StemsN_P25comp_x[gNeut] InflN_P25comp_x[gNeut]
StemsN_P25sup_x[gMsc] InflN_P25sup_x[gMsc]
StemsN_P25sup_x[gFem] InflN_P25sup_x[gFem]
StemsN_P25sup_x[gNeut] InflN_P25sup_x[gNeut]
StemsN_P12_x[gMsc] InflN_P12_x[gMsc]
StemsN_P45_x[gFem] InflN_P45_x[gFem]
StemsN_P1_x InflN_P1_x
StemsN_P2_x InflN_P2_x
StemsV_P71_pres_stem InflV_P71_pres_stem
StemsV_P71_inf_stem InflV_P71_inf_stem
StemsV_P71_imperative InflV_P71_imperative
StemsV_P100_present InflV_P100_present
StemsV_P100_preterite InflV_P100_preterite
StemsV_P115_present InflV_P115_present
StemsV_P115_preterite InflV_P115_preterite
StemsVp_P29_decl InflVp_P29_decl
StemsVp_P68_decl InflVp_P68_decl
StemsVp_P69_decl InflVp_P69_decl
FuncWords
Adverbs
Numerals
Variants
